Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2424.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 5114SV (3) 91 ak/ko S.F. 2424 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 139A.8C Vaccination requirements ââ 1 clinical rotations. 2 1. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise 3 requires: 4 a. âAccredited private institutionâ means the same as 5 defined in section 256.183. 6 b. âClinical rotationâ means a period of training completed 7 for academic credit by a student in a medical, nursing, or 8 other health care-related degree that is supervised by a health 9 care professional in a facility. For the purposes of this 10 paragraph, âfacilityâ means the same as defined in section 11 514J.102. 12 c. âPostsecondary schoolâ means the same as defined in 13 section 139A.8B. 14 2. a. A postsecondary school offering a degree program 15 requiring a clinical rotation shall, upon request of a student 16 enrolled in the degree program, identify a clinical rotation 17 placement where the student will be permitted an exemption from 18 any vaccination requirements imposed by the placement location 19 during the duration of the studentâs clinical rotation. 20 b. (1) A student enrolled in a degree program requiring a 21 clinical rotation may report a postsecondary schoolâs alleged 22 violation of paragraph âaâ to the attorney general. The 23 attorney general shall provide notice of such report to the 24 department and the postsecondary school within fifteen calendar 25 days of the date of receipt of the report. No later than thirty 26 calendar days after the date of receipt of the report, the 27 postsecondary school shall do one of the following: 28 (a) Correct the violation and provide documentation of the 29 correction to the attorney general and the department. 30 (b) Provide documentation to the attorney general and the 31 department demonstrating that the alleged violation by the 32 postsecondary school upon which the report was based was not 33 a violation of paragraph âaâ . 34 c. (1) If an accredited private institution is found by 35 -1- LSB 5114SV (3) 91 ak/ko 1/ 4 S.F. 2424 the attorney general to be in violation of paragraph âaâ , 1 or paragraph âbâ , subparagraph (1), subparagraph division 2 (a) or (b), on or before September 30 of each calendar year, 3 the accredited private institution shall not qualify as an 4 eligible institution for the purposes of Iowa tuition grants 5 under chapter 256, subchapter VII, part 4, subpart B, for 6 the immediately succeeding academic year. The attorney 7 general shall notify the college student aid commission of the 8 accredited private institutionâs disqualification. 9 (2) If an accredited private institution is found by the 10 attorney general to be in compliance with the requirements 11 under paragraph âaâ , or paragraph âbâ , subparagraph (1), 12 subparagraph divisions (a) or (b), on or before September 30 13 of each calendar year, the institution shall qualify as an 14 eligible institution for Iowa tuition grants under chapter 15 256, subchapter VII, part 4, subpart B, for the immediately 16 succeeding academic year. The attorney general shall notify 17 the college student aid commission that the institution 18 qualifies as an eligible institution. 19 d. A postsecondary school found by the attorney general to 20 be in violation of paragraph âaâ , or paragraph âbâ , subparagraph 21 (1), subparagraph division (a) or (b), on or before September 22 30 of each calendar year, shall be subject to a civil penalty 23 of five thousand dollars. The civil penalty shall be collected 24 by the attorney general and deposited into the general fund of 25 the state. 26 Sec. 2. Section 256.183, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 27 to read as follows: 28 3. âEligible institutionâ means an institution of higher 29 learning located in Iowa which is operated privately and 30 not controlled or administered by any state agency or any 31 subdivision of the state, which is not exempt from taxation 32 under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, and which 33 meets all of the criteria in subsection 1 , paragraphs âdâ 34 through âkâ , and or is a school of barbering and cosmetology 35 -2- LSB 5114SV (3) 91 ak/ko 2/ 4 S.F. 2424 arts and sciences licensed under chapter 157 and is accredited 1 by a national accrediting agency recognized by the United 2 States department of education. For the fiscal year beginning 3 July 1, 2017, such a school of barbering and cosmetology arts 4 and sciences shall provide a matching aggregate amount of 5 institutional financial aid equal to at least seventy-five 6 percent of the amount received by the institutionâs students 7 for Iowa tuition grant assistance under section 256.191 . For 8 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2018, the school of barbering 9 and cosmetology arts and sciences shall provide a matching 10 aggregate amount of institutional financial aid equal to at 11 least eighty-five percent of the amount received in that fiscal 12 year. Commencing with the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2019, 13 and each succeeding fiscal year, the matching aggregate amount 14 of institutional financial aid shall be at least equal to the 15 match provided by eligible institutions under section 261.9, 16 subsection 3 , paragraph âaâ , Code 2023. 17